North Carolina statutes. Chapter 108D. Medicaid and NC Health Choice Managed Care Programs.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 108D-1.
Definitions.

The following definitions apply in this Chapter:

Adverse benefit determination. — As defined in 42 C.F.R. § 438.400(b). In accordance with 42 C.F.R. § 457.1260, this definition applies to NC Health Choice beneficiaries in the same manner as it applies to Medicaid beneficiaries.

Adverse disenrollment determination. — A determination by the Department of Health and Human Services or the enrollment broker to (i) deny a request made by an enrollee, or the enrollee’s authorized representative, to disenroll from a prepaid health plan or (ii) approve a request made by a prepaid health plan to disenroll an enrollee from a prepaid health plan.

Applicant. — A provider who is seeking to participate in the network of one or more local management entity/managed care organizations or prepaid health plans.

Behavioral health and intellectual/developmental disabilities tailored plan or BH IDD tailored plan. — A capitated prepaid health plan contract under the Medicaid transformation demonstration waiver that meets all of the requirements of Article 4 of this Chapter, including the requirements pertaining to BH IDD tailored plans.

Beneficiary. — A person to whom or on whose behalf medical assistance or assistance through the North Carolina Health Choice for Children program is granted under Article 2 of Chapter 108A of the General Statutes.

Closed network. — The network of providers that have contracted with (i) a local management entity/managed care organization operating the combined 1915(b) and (c) waivers or (ii) an entity operating a BH IDD tailored plan to furnish mental health, intellectual or developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services to enrollees.

(6a)

CMS. — The Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

Contested case hearing. — The hearing or hearings conducted at the Office of Administrative Hearings under

G.S. 108D-5.9

or

G.S. 108D-15

.

Department. — The North Carolina Department of Health and Human Services.

Emergency medical condition. — As defined in 42 C.F.R. § 438.114.

(12)

Emergency services. — As defined in 42 C.F.R. § 438.114.

(13)

Enrollee. — A Medicaid or NC Health Choice beneficiary who is currently enrolled with a local management entity/managed care organization or a prepaid health plan.

(14)

Enrollment broker. — As defined in 42 C.F.R. § 438.810(a).

(16)

Fee-for-service program. — A payment model for the Medicaid and NC Health Choice programs operated by the Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to its authority under Part 6 and Part 8 of Article 2 of Chapter 108A of the General Statutes in which the Department pays enrolled providers for services provided to Medicaid and NC Health Choice beneficiaries rather than contracting for the coverage of services through a capitated payment arrangement.

(21)

Local Management Entity or LME. — As defined in

G.S. 122C-3

.

(22)

Local Management Entity/Managed Care Organization or LME/MCO. — As defined in

G.S. 122C-3

.

(23)

Mail. — United States mail or, if the enrollee or the enrollee’s authorized representative has given written consent to receive electronic communications, electronic mail.

(24)

Managed care entity. — A local management entity/managed care organization or a prepaid health plan.

(25)

Medicaid transformation demonstration waiver. — The waiver agreement entered into between the State and the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services under Section 1115 of the Social Security Act for the transition to prepaid health plans.

(26)

Mental health, intellectual or developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services or MH/IDD/SA services. — Those mental health, intellectual or developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services covered by a local management entity/managed care organization under a contract with the Department of Health and Human Services to operate the combined Medicaid waiver program authorized under Section 1915(b) and Section 1915(c) of the Social Security Act.

(27)

Network provider. — An appropriately credentialed provider that has entered into a contract for participation in the network of one or more local management entity/managed care organizations or prepaid health plans.

(28)

Notice of adverse benefit determination. — The notice required by 42 C.F.R. § 438.404.

(29) OAH.

— The North Carolina Office of Administrative Hearings.

(30)

Prepaid health plan or PHP. — A prepaid health plan, as defined in

G.S. 58-93-5

, that is under a capitated contract with the Department for the delivery of Medicaid and NC Health Choice services, or a local management entity/managed care organization that is under a capitated contract with the Department to operate a BH IDD tailored plan.

(31)

Provider. — As defined in

G.S. 108C-2

.

(32)

Provider of emergency services. — A provider that is qualified to furnish emergency services to evaluate or stabilize an enrollee’s emergency medical condition.

(36)

Standard benefit plan. — A capitated prepaid health plan contract under the Medicaid transformation demonstration waiver that meets all of the requirements of Article 4 of this Chapter except for the requirements pertaining to a BH IDD tailored plan.

History.

2013-397, s. 1; 2019-81, s. 1(a); 2021-62, ss. 4.6, 4.7(a).

Choice in Accreditation for LME/MCOS Operating BH IDD Tailored Plans.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 9D.17(a)-(c), provides: “(a) During the initial four-year contract term for Medicaid BH IDD tailored plans, as defined under

G.S. 108D-1

, the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits (DHB), shall not require, by contract or otherwise, any local management entity/managed care organization (LME/MCO) to be accredited by any one specific accreditation organization. DHB shall require each LME/MCO awarded a BH IDD tailored plan contract to be accredited by a nationally recognized accreditation organization that has been selected by the LME/MCO and approved by DHB. DHB shall create a process by which DHB approves the accreditation organization selected by the LME/MCO.

“(b) No accreditation organization shall be approved by DHB for use by an LME/MCO under this section unless the accreditation organization meets, at a minimum, all of the following criteria:

“(1) Prior experience conducting accreditation reviews for managed care organizations in at least five other states within the United States or in at least two regions that correspond to the areas covered by the regional office locations of the United States Department of Health and Human Services.

“(2) A review program that includes, at a minimum, standards for the following aspects of operation of the LME/MCO:

“a. Quality assurance.

“b. Provider credentialing.

“c. Utilization review.

“d. Enrollee rights and responsibilities.

“e. Medical records.

“f. Governance of the LME/MCO.

“g. Preventative health services.

“(3) Development of accreditation standards that include input from the medical, managed care organization, and health care consumer communities.

“(4) Reviews of, and updates to, the standards listed under subdivision (3) of this subsection at regular intervals not exceeding two years.

“(5) An internal quality assurance program that ensures the quality and continuity of its review program.

“(6) No current involvement in the operation of the LME/MCO or the delivery of health services to any of its enrollees.

“(7) No contract or consultations with the LME/MCO within the prior two years for any services other than accreditation.

“(c) All accreditation organizations approved for use by an LME/MCO under this section shall be required to submit their standards for accreditation to DHB every three years to maintain approval for use by the LME/MCO.”

Evaluate DHB Needs in Managed Care Environment.

Session Laws 180, s. 9D.18(a)-(c), provides: “(a) Evaluations. — The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits (DHB), shall conduct a two part evaluation of the current staffing and administrative functions for the Medicaid and NC Health Choice programs and how those staffing needs and administrative functions will change as the Medicaid and NC Health Choice programs move further into a managed care service delivery environment. In conducting this evaluation, DHB shall do all of the following:

“(1) Identify the changing administrative needs and required staff based upon the introduction of capitated contracts for standard benefit plans and BH IDD tailored benefit plans.

“(2) Determine whether any administrative or staffing functions are duplicative of any functions carried out through vendor contracts, by local management entities/managed care organizations (LME/MCOs), or prepaid health plans (PHPs).

“(b) Initial Report. — No later than March 1, 2022, DHB shall report to the Joint Oversight Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice and the Fiscal Research Division on the evaluation required by subsection (a) of this section as it pertains to the implementation of capitated contracts for standard benefit plans for PHPs. The report shall include planned staffing and administrative changes, including any changes to contractual agreements with vendors, to align more appropriately with a managed care delivery environment for the Medicaid and NC Health Choice programs. The report shall also include a detailed time line for making changes within DHB as managed care continues.

“(c) Final Report. — No later than March 1, 2024, DHB shall report to the Joint Oversight Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice and the Fiscal Research Division on the evaluation required by subsection (a) of this section as it pertains to the implementation of capitated contracts for standard benefit plans operated by PHPs and the implementation of BH IDD tailored plans. The report shall include the staffing and administrative changes that have been made since the initial report required under subsection (b) of this section. The report shall also include any additional planned staffing and administrative changes and any planned changes to contractual agreements with vendors to continue to align DHB's functions more appropriately with a managed care delivery environment for the Medicaid and NC Health Choice programs. The report shall also include an updated detailed time line for making these changes within DHB, as well as an assessment of whether the goals of the time line submitted in the initial report were met.”

Require LME/MCOS to Pay for Behavioral Health Services Provided to Beneficiaries Awaiting Hospital Discharge.

Session Laws 2018-180, s. 9D.22(a)-(h), provides: “(a) Intent. — It is the intent of the General Assembly to provide funding to hospitals for behavioral health services provided to Medicaid beneficiaries while those beneficiaries await discharge to a more appropriate setting.

“(b) Criteria for Coverage. — The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits (DHB), is directed to develop a clinical coverage policy, or amend an existing clinical coverage policy as applicable, assign a CPT code, and develop billing instructions for Medicaid coverage of the services described in subsection (c) of this section provided to a beneficiary who meets all of the following criteria:

“(1) The beneficiary no longer meets criteria for observation under Section 3.2.1(b) of Medicaid Clinical Coverage Policy 2A 1: Acute Inpatient Hospital Services.

“(2) The beneficiary is not currently receiving inpatient behavioral health services covered under Medicaid Clinical Coverage Policy 8B: Inpatient Behavioral Health Services.

“(3) A physician, physician assistant, or nurse practitioner has determined that one of the following actions is appropriate for the beneficiary:

“a. Admission to an inpatient psychiatric or behavioral health facility.

“b. Admission to a facility, other than an inpatient facility, for care for psychiatric or behavioral health needs, such as a group home.

“c. Arrangement for community based services or supports without which the beneficiary cannot be safely discharged to the beneficiary's home due to the beneficiary's psychiatric or behavioral health needs.

“(4) The beneficiary has been in the care of the hospital for a minimum of 30 continuous hours.

“(c) Services Covered. — The clinical coverage policy developed in accordance with this section shall provide Medicaid coverage of the following services in an acute care hospital setting when medically necessary and ordered by a physician or other appropriate provider:

“(1) Treatment, including assessment and medication management, of both psychiatric and behavioral health conditions and physical health conditions.

“(2) Crisis stabilization and support.

“(3) Ongoing monitoring of a beneficiary's medical status and medical clearance.

“(4) Nursing services and support.

“(5) Reasonable and appropriate efforts to maintain patient safety.

“(6) Provision of community resource information and psychoeducation, including connections to the relevant local management entity/managed care organization (LME/MCO).

“(7) Development of a safety plan, including any revisions to that plan.

“(8) Coordination with the beneficiary or the beneficiary's legal representative and the LME/MCO to establish a safe discharge plan or transfer plan.

“Services developed in accordance with this subsection shall be considered outpatient services. Other ancillary services, such as laboratory services, imaging, and prescription drugs, shall continue to be billed as separate and additional services not included as part of this new Medicaid coverage. Notwithstanding G.S. 108D 35, any new services developed in accordance with this subsection shall be limited to beneficiaries enrolled in NC Medicaid Direct or in a BH IDD tailored plan, as defined in G.S. 108D 1.

“(d) Reimbursement for Beneficiaries Enrolled in NC Medicaid Direct. – Services covered under the Medicaid clinical coverage policy developed in accordance with subsection (b) of this section and provided to beneficiaries enrolled in NC Medicaid Direct who are not also enrolled with an LME/MCO shall be reimbursed at a fee for service rate determined by DHB.

“(e) Reimbursement for Beneficiaries Enrolled in an LME/MCO or a BH IDD Tailored Plan. — Services covered under the Medicaid clinical coverage policy developed in accordance with subsection (b) of this section shall be covered by LME/MCOs, including LME/MCOs operating BH IDD tailored plans. If a beneficiary who is an enrollee of an LME/MCO or a BH IDD tailored plan receives these services, then the applicable LME/MCO shall be responsible for making the reimbursement payment to the hospital billing for the services. The reimbursement amount shall be determined through negotiations between each hospital and LME/MCO. If an LME/MCO and any hospital are unable to negotiate a reimbursement amount for these services, then the reimbursement rate shall be the most prevalent semiprivate room rate at the applicable hospital.

“(f) CMS Approval. — The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits, shall submit to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) any State Plan amendments necessary to establish the new Medicaid coverage required by this section. The new Medicaid covered services and rates shall be implemented July 1, 2022. If approval from CMS is not granted by July 1, 2022, DHB shall retroactively implement services and rates upon approval from CMS to July 1, 2022. The new Medicaid covered services and rates shall only be implemented to the extent allowable by CMS.

“(g) Capitation Rates. — It is the intent of the General Assembly that there will be no increase in the capitation rates paid to LME/MCOs for any services developed under this section. If an increase in capitation rates paid to LME/MCOs is necessary to maintain the actuarial soundness of those paid capitation rates, then DHB shall increase the capitation rates by the minimum amount necessary for federal approval of the rates.

“(h) Effective Date. — This section is effective when it becomes law.” This section became effective November 18, 2021.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2013-397, s. 11, made this Chapter effective August 23, 2013, and applicable to grievances and managed care actions filed on or after that date.

Session Laws 2013-397, s. 5, provides: “By September 30, 2013, the Department of Health and Human Services shall take any action necessary to implement this act, including submitting to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services a Medicaid State Plan Amendment with a retroactive effective date of July 1, 2013. On or before September 30, 2013, the Department of Health and Human Services shall report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services on the status of the implementation of this act.”

Session Laws 2019-81, s. 1(a), effective October 1, 2019, rewrote the Chapter 108D heading, which formerly read: “Medicaid Managed Care for Behavioral Health Services.”

Session Laws 2019-81, s. 1(b), provides: “This section is effective October 1, 2019, and applies to (i) appeals arising from local management entity/managed care organization (LME/MCO) notices of adverse benefit determination mailed on or after that date and (ii) grievances received by an LME/MCO on or after that date.”

Session Laws 2021-3, s. 2.20, provides: “Notwithstanding any provision of Chapter 130A of the General Statutes or any other provision of law to the contrary, the Department of Health and Human Services shall, by July 1, 2021, grant each prepaid health plan, as defined in

G.S. 108D-1

, access to client-specific immunization information contained within the secure, web-based North Carolina Immunization Registry.”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 43.5, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2013-397, s. 11, made this Chapter effective August 23, 2013, and applicable to grievances and managed care actions filed on or after that date.

Session Laws 2013-397, s. 5, provides: “By September 30, 2013, the Department of Health and Human Services shall take any action necessary to implement this act, including submitting to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services a Medicaid State Plan Amendment with a retroactive effective date of July 1, 2013. On or before September 30, 2013, the Department of Health and Human Services shall report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services on the status of the implementation of this act.”

Session Laws 2019-81, s. 1(a), effective October 1, 2019, rewrote the Chapter 108D heading, which formerly read: “Medicaid Managed Care for Behavioral Health Services.”

Session Laws 2019-81, s. 1(b), provides: “This section is effective October 1, 2019, and applies to (i) appeals arising from local management entity/managed care organization (LME/MCO) notices of adverse benefit determination mailed on or after that date and (ii) grievances received by an LME/MCO on or after that date.”

Session Laws 2021-3, s. 2.20, provides: “Notwithstanding any provision of Chapter 130A of the General Statutes or any other provision of law to the contrary, the Department of Health and Human Services shall, by July 1, 2021, grant each prepaid health plan, as defined in

G.S. 108D-1

, access to client-specific immunization information contained within the secure, web-based North Carolina Immunization Registry.”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2019-81, s. 1(a), effective October 1, 2019, rewrote the section. For effective date and applicability, see Editor’s note.

Session Laws 2021-62, ss. 4.6, 4.7(a), effective June 29, 2021, added subdivision (6a), and in subdivision (6), inserted “operating the combined 1915(b) and (c) waivers or (ii) an entity operating a BH IDD tailored plan” and made a minor stylistic change.

§ 108D-2.
Scope; applicability of this Chapter.

This Chapter applies to every managed care entity, applicant, enrollee, provider of emergency services, and network provider of a managed care entity. This Chapter does not apply to Medicaid or NC Health Choice services delivered through the fee-for-service program. Nothing in this Chapter shall be construed to grant a NC Health Choice beneficiary benefits in excess of what is required by

G.S. 108A-70.21

.

History.

2013-397, s. 1; 2019-81, s. 1(a).

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2019-81, s. 1(b), provides: “This section is effective October 1, 2019, and applies to (i) appeals arising from local management entity/managed care organization (LME/MCO) notices of adverse benefit determination mailed on or after that date and (ii) grievances received by an LME/MCO on or after that date.”

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2019-81, s. 1(a), rewrote the section, which formerly read: “This Chapter applies to every LME/MCO and to every applicant, enrollee, provider of emergency services, and network provider of an LME/MCO.” For effective date and applicability, see Editor’s note.

§ 108D-3.
Conflicts; severability.

To the extent that this Chapter conflicts with the Social Security Act or 42 C.F.R. Parts 438 and 457, federal law prevails, except when the applicability of federal law or rules have been waived by agreement between the State and the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services.

To the extent that this Chapter conflicts with any other provision of State law that is contrary to the principles of managed care that will ensure successful containment of costs for health care services, this Chapter prevails and applies.

If any section, term, or provision of this Chapter is adjudged invalid for any reason, these judgments shall not affect, impair, or invalidate any other section, term, or provision of this Chapter, but the remaining sections, terms, and provisions shall be and remain in full force and effect.

History.

2013-397, s. 1; 2019-81, s. 1(a).

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2019-81, s. 1(b), provides: “This section is effective October 1, 2019, and applies to (i) appeals arising from local management entity/managed care organization (LME/MCO) notices of adverse benefit determination mailed on or after that date and (ii) grievances received by an LME/MCO on or after that date.”

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2019-81, s. 1(a), rewrote subsection (a), which formerly read: “To the extent that this Chapter conflicts with the Social Security Act or 42 C.F.R. Part 438, federal law prevails”; and in subsection (b), deleted “behavioral” preceding “health care services.” For effective date and applicability, see Editor’s note.

§§ 108D-4,
108D-5.

Reserved for future codification purposes.